Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3
SERVICES WITH SPECIAL STATE PROVISIONS

25.5-5-301. Clinic services.

As used in this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires, "clinic services" means preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or palliative items or services furnished to outpatients.

Under the federal option for clinic services, Colorado has selected clinic services provided by the following:

Community mental health centers or clinics;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Community centered boards;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Case management agencies;

Birthing centers;

Ambulatory surgery facilities;

Freestanding dialysis clinics.

"Clinic services" also means preventive, therapeutic, or palliative items or services that are furnished to patients by county or district public health agencies or county or district boards of health established pursuant to part 5 of article 1 of title 25, C.R.S., that are recommended for certification by the department of public health and environment as qualified to receive payments pursuant to this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.

"Clinic services" also means preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or palliative items or services furnished to a pregnant woman who is enrolled or eligible for services pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(c) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(m.5) in a facility that is not a part of a hospital but is organized and operated as a freestanding substance use disorder treatment program approved and licensed by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services pursuant to section 27-80-108 (1)(c).

"Clinic services" also means preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or palliative items or services that are furnished to children up to age twenty-one or to high-risk pregnant women in a facility which is not a part of a hospital but is organized and operated as a school-based clinic.

"Clinic services" also means preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative, or palliative items or services that are furnished to students by a school district, board of cooperative services, or state educational institution within the scope of the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" pursuant to the provisions of section 25.5-5-318.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1866, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 314, § 5, effective April 15; (4) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 801, § 68, effective April 29; (3) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2113, § 145, effective August 11.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 116, § 12, effective February 27.

L. 2017:

(4) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1328, § 201, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 332, § 27, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:

(4) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1513, § 70, effective July 1.

25.5-5-302. Clinic services - children and pregnant women - utilization of certain providers.

The state department shall utilize, to the extent possible and appropriate, county or district public health agencies or boards of health established pursuant to part 5 of article 1 of title 25, C.R.S., that are certified by the department of public health and environment as qualified to receive payments pursuant to this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title and that meet the requirements and standards set forth in rules promulgated by the state board in the state department pursuant to section 25.5-4-104 to provide clinic services to patients who are children under age seven or patients who are pregnant women.

In complying with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the state department shall utilize, to the extent possible and appropriate, the county or district public health agencies and boards of health specified in subsection (1) of this section to provide outreach to eligible pregnant women and children and to provide clinic services:

Upon the referral of any physician; or

When there exists no primary care physician who agrees to provide clinic services to such patients.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1867, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) and IP(2) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2113, § 146, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-514 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-303. Private-duty nursing.

The medical assistance program in this state shall include private-duty nursing to persons who are technology dependent and otherwise eligible as provided under this section.

A recipient is eligible for private-duty nursing services if he or she:

Is dependent on technology at least part of each day;

Requires private-duty nursing care as determined in accordance with state department rules;

Is able to be served safely under the limitations of the private-duty nursing benefit and within the availability of services; and

Is not residing in a nursing facility or hospital at the time of the delivery of the private-duty nursing services.

The state board shall establish rules in accordance with this section that identify medical criteria for determining the circumstances under which private-duty nursing services will be delivered to assure that only persons who need the services receive them and only to the extent medically necessary.

Private-duty nursing services shall not be provided as twenty-four-hour care except in special circumstances and for limited time periods as established by the state department pursuant to this section.

The home health agency, in conjunction with the family or in-home caregiver and the attending physician, shall include in a care plan that includes private-duty nursing services a process by which the eligible person may receive necessary care, which may include respite care, if the family or in-home caregiver is unavailable due to an emergency situation or to unforeseen circumstances. The family or in-home caregiver shall be duly informed by the home health agency of these alternative care provisions at the time the care plan is initiated.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "private-duty nursing" means nursing care that is more individualized and continuous than both the nursing care available under the home health benefit and the nursing care routinely provided in a hospital or nursing facility.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1867, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-517 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-304. Hospice care.

The medical assistance program in this state shall include hospice care. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, hospice care shall be provided for a period of up to two hundred ten days in accordance with rules adopted by the state board, which rules shall comply with 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396d, and shall include at least the following requirements:

That a person shall obtain a certified medical prognosis indicating a life expectancy of nine months or less, which certification shall comply with rules adopted by the state board;

That a person shall execute a waiver of other medical benefits available under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title, which election shall be executed in accordance with rules adopted by the state board;

That the service shall be reasonable and necessary for the palliation or management of the terminal illness and related conditions.

Hospice care may be provided to a person beyond two hundred ten days if such person is recertified by a physician or hospice medical director as terminally ill in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

Subject to the receipt of any necessary federal authorization, for a person who has executed the waiver described in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section and who is a resident in a class I facility, as defined in section 25.5-6-201 (13), the class I facility shall bill the state department and the state department shall pay the class I facility for the room and board costs of the person.

Subject to the receipt of any necessary federal authorization, the hospice care provided pursuant to this section may include room and board in a hospice inpatient facility licensed pursuant to section 25-3-101, C.R.S. The state department is authorized to establish the reimbursement rate for the costs for room and board at a licensed hospice inpatient facility for patients eligible for the routine level of hospice care.

If required, the state department shall seek the appropriate federal authorization, conditioned on the receipt of gifts, grants, or donations sufficient to provide for the state's administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request, to make the payment described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) and to include room and board at a licensed hospice inpatient facility as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3). On or before January 15, 2011, the state department shall submit a brief report to the members of the health and human services committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, on the status of any request for authorization pursuant to this subparagraph (I). If federal authorization to implement the changes described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3) is obtained, the state department shall request, through the state budget process, that the changes be implemented during the fiscal year following the year in which the approval is obtained.

The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purpose of providing for the administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request for federal approval for the payments described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3). All such private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the hospice care account in the department of health care policy and financing cash fund created pursuant to section 25.5-1-109, which account is hereby created. Moneys in the account shall be subject to appropriation and shall only be used for the purposes described in this subparagraph (II).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1868, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended and (4) added, (HB 10-1027), ch. 274, p. 1256, § 1, effective August 11; (3) added, (SB 10-061), ch. 247, p. 1104, § 1, effective August 11.

25.5-5-305. Pediatric hospice care - legislative declaration - federal authorization - rules - fund.

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The death of a child has a devastating and enduring impact on the child's family;

Too often, children with fatal conditions and their families fail to receive compassionate and consistent care that meets their physical, emotional, and spiritual needs;

Better care is possible but current methods of organizing and financing palliative, end-of-life, and bereavement care impede the provision of services that are both more appropriate and more cost-efficient;

Current federal medicaid regulations contain inherent barriers to providing appropriate palliative and end-of-life care to pediatric patients. These barriers include requirements that preclude the pursuit of curative treatments, mandate a do-not-resuscitate order, and require physician certification that death is expected within six months.

The general assembly declares that it is in the best interest of the state to investigate and implement hospice guidelines that provide appropriate, compassionate care to dying children and their families while proving to be cost-neutral or cost-saving to the state and federal medicaid programs.

The general assembly further finds and declares that, while this direction immediately concerns federal approval for hospice care that recognizes the distinct circumstances of children facing life-threatening illnesses and their families, it is the intent of the general assembly that the information and data produced as a result of this act shall be used to improve the delivery of palliative and end-of-life services to persons of all ages when such improvements can be made in a manner that is cost-neutral or cost-saving to the state.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible child" means a child who:

Is less than nineteen years of age; and

Is eligible for the state's medicaid program pursuant to section 25.5-5-101, 25.5-5-201, or 25.5-5-203;

"Pediatric hospice care" means hospice care for eligible children as authorized in this section.

Pediatric hospice care.

The state department shall seek the appropriate federal authorization, conditioned on the receipt of gifts, grants, or donations sufficient to provide for the state's administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request, for pediatric hospice care that shall include but may not be limited to:

Respite care;

Expressive therapies, as defined in rule by the state board;

Palliative care from the time of diagnosis of a potentially life-threatening illness; and

A continuum of care through the coordination of services, which may include skilled, intermittent, and around-the-clock nursing care.

The state department is authorized to seek federal approval for modifications to the provision of hospice care for adults who are eligible for the state's medicaid program.

For the provision of pediatric hospice care, the state department shall seek an exemption from the following federal medicaid requirements for the eligibility of and election for hospice care:

The mandatory do-not-resuscitate order;

A physician's certification that a patient is expected to live less than six months; and

The nonallowance of curative care therapies concurrent with palliative and hospice care.

In any application for federal authorization pursuant to this section, the state department shall retain bereavement services to the extent available under federal law.

Pediatric hospice care, as authorized pursuant to this section, shall meet aggregate federal waiver budget neutrality requirements.

The state department shall implement the provision of pediatric hospice care to the extent authorized by the federal government.

Review. The state department shall notify the joint budget committee of the general assembly of the extent to which the state department received federal authorization for pediatric hospice care services pursuant to this section in order for the joint budget committee to review the approved budget neutrality analysis for such services prior to the state department's implementation.

Rules. The state department shall develop the service provisions for pediatric hospice care in consultation with medical professionals who have expertise in providing end-of-life and palliative care to pediatric patients and family members who have experienced the death of a child. The state board shall adopt rules necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section.

Fund. The state department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purpose of providing for the administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request for federal approval for the provision of pediatric hospice care. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the pediatric hospice care cash fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for preparing and submitting the request for federal approval pursuant to this section. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred or revert to the general fund or another fund.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1868, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-533 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-306. Residential child health care - waiver - program - rules - notice to revisor - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

(1) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 1202, § 2, effective May 26; entire article added with relocations, p. 1871, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 1517, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 801, § 69, effective April 29.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1809, § 45, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 773, § 68, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(5) and (6) added, (HB 18-1328), ch. 184, p. 1242, § 2, effective July 1; (1) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 445, § 111, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(3) and (4) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1708, § 181, effective October 1.

25.5-5-307. Child mental health treatment and family support program.

The general assembly finds that many parents in Colorado who have experienced challenging circumstances because their children have significant mental health needs and who have attempted to care for their children or seek services on their behalf often are burdened with the excessive financial and personal costs of providing such care. Private insurance companies may not cover mental health services and rarely cover residential mental health treatment services; those that do seldom cover a sufficient percentage of the expense to make such mental health treatment a viable option for many families in need. The result is that many families do not have the ability to obtain the mental health services that they feel their children desperately need. The general assembly finds that it is in the best interests of these families and the citizens of the state to encourage the preservation of family units by making mental health treatment available to these children pursuant to article 67 of title 27, C.R.S.

In order to make mental health treatment available, it is the intent of the general assembly that each medicaid-eligible child who is diagnosed as a person with a mental health disorder, as that term is defined in section 27-65-102 (11.5), must receive mental health treatment, which may include in-home family mental health treatment, other family preservation services, residential treatment, or any post-residential follow-up services, that must be paid for through federal medicaid funding.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1872, § 7, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1389, § 19, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 802, § 70, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1328, § 202, effective May 25.

25.5-5-308. Breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program - creation - legislative declaration - definitions - funds - repeal.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that breast and cervical cancer are significant health problems for women in this state. The general assembly further finds and declares that these cancers can and should be prevented and treated whenever possible. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly to enact this section to provide for the prevention and treatment of breast and cervical cancer to women where it is not otherwise available for reasons of cost.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Eligible person" means a person who:

Has been screened for breast or cervical cancer under the centers for disease control and prevention's national breast and cervical cancer early detection program established under Title XV of the federal "Public Health Service Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 300k et seq., in accordance with the requirements of section 1504 of such act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 300n, on or after July 1, 2002, unless the centers for medicare and medicaid services approves the state department's amendment to the medical assistance plan and the state department is able to implement the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program before such date, then the person must be screened on or after the implementation date of such program; or

Has been screened for breast or cervical cancer by any provider, within the provider's scope of practice, who does not receive funds through the centers for disease control and prevention's national breast and cervical cancer early detection program but whose screening activities are recognized by the department of public health and environment as part of screening activities under the centers for disease control and prevention's national breast and cervical cancer early detection program;

Has been diagnosed with breast or cervical cancer and is in need of breast or cervical cancer treatment;

Has not yet attained sixty-five years of age; and

Does not have any creditable coverage as defined under federal law pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 300gg-3 (c).

"Qualified entity" shall be defined pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r-1b(b)(2).

There is hereby created a breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program to provide medical benefits to eligible persons under this section.

Benefits for medical assistance to an eligible person shall be made available beginning on the day on which a determination is made that the person is eligible for medical assistance and throughout the period in which such person meets the definition of an eligible person.

Benefits for medical assistance to an eligible person shall also be available for the following period of presumptive eligibility:

Such period of presumptive eligibility shall begin when a qualified entity determines that the eligible person is in need of treatment for breast or cervical cancer.

Such period of presumptive eligibility shall end with the earlier of:

The day on which a determination is made that the person is eligible or not eligible for medical assistance; or

If the eligible person does not file a simplified application for medical assistance developed by the state department and approved by the centers for medicare and medicaid services on or before the last day of the month following the month during which the eligible person was found to be qualified for services under this section, then benefits shall end on such last day.

The state department shall have the following powers and duties:

To establish, operate, and monitor the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program to provide medical assistance to eligible persons in accordance with the provisions of the federal "Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000", enacted October 24, 2000, Pub.L. 106-354, as amended;

To amend the state's medical assistance plan to incorporate the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program. The state department shall submit such proposed amendment to the centers for medicare and medicaid services regional office for approval.

To accept and expend any grant or award of moneys from the federal government, any moneys appropriated by the general assembly, any moneys received through gifts, grants, or donations from nonprofit or for-profit entities, and any interest and income earned on such moneys for the purposes set forth in this section;

To inform the joint budget committee of the general assembly in writing as soon as practicable about any change in the rate of federal financial participation in the program.

The state board shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program is subject to the annual financial and compliance audit of the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" performed by the state auditor's office and shall not be considered a tobacco settlement program for purposes of section 2-3-113, C.R.S.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund, referred to in this subsection (8) as the "fund". The fund shall consist of any moneys credited thereto pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., any gifts, grants, and donations, any moneys appropriated thereto by the general assembly, and moneys credited thereto pursuant to section 42-3-217.5 (3)(c), C.R.S. Except as provided for in paragraph (b.5) of this subsection (8), all moneys credited to the fund and all interest and income earned on the moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund for the purposes set forth in this section. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund. The state department is encouraged to secure private gifts, grants, and donations to fund the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program.
(8) (a) (I) There is hereby created in the state treasury the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund, referred to in this subsection (8) as the "fund". The fund shall consist of any moneys credited thereto pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., any gifts, grants, and donations, any moneys appropriated thereto by the general assembly, and moneys credited thereto pursuant to section 42-3-217.5 (3)(c), C.R.S. Except as provided for in paragraph (b.5) of this subsection (8), all moneys credited to the fund and all interest and income earned on the moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund for the purposes set forth in this section. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund. The state department is encouraged to secure private gifts, grants, and donations to fund the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program.

Moneys in the fund may be used to cover the administrative costs of the department of public health and environment to recognize providers in accordance with sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section as providing screening activities under the centers for disease control and prevention's national breast and cervical cancer early detection program.

Repealed.

Until section 24-30-2204.5 is repealed, the state treasurer shall transfer any interest or income earned on moneys in the fund to the disability support fund, created in section 24-30-2205.5.

Repealed.

For the fiscal year 2005-06, the general assembly shall appropriate fifty percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the general fund and fifty percent from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal year 2006-07, the general assembly shall appropriate seventy-five percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the general fund and twenty-five percent from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal year 2007-08, the general assembly shall appropriate one hundred percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal year 2008-09, the general assembly shall appropriate one hundred percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal years 2009-10 through 2011-12, the general assembly shall annually appropriate one hundred percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal years 2012-13 and 2013-14, the general assembly shall annually appropriate fifty percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the general fund and fifty percent from the moneys credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund pursuant to section 24-22-115 (1), C.R.S., to such program.

For the fiscal years 2014-15 through 2028-29, the general assembly shall annually appropriate one hundred percent of the state costs of the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment program from the money credited to the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund to the program; except that, if the money in the breast and cervical cancer prevention and treatment fund is insufficient to fully fund the program, the general assembly shall appropriate sufficient money from the general fund.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2029, unless, in any fiscal year before such date, money received as federal financial participation provided pursuant to the federal "Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of 2000", enacted October 24, 2000, Pub.L. 106-354, as amended, is no longer available to the fund or the rate of federal financial participation has been decreased, in which case the general assembly may repeal this section at the regular session of the general assembly immediately following such decrease or discontinuation of federal money.

Source:

L. 2006:

(8) amended, p. 1117, § 2, effective May 25; entire article added with relocations, p. 1872, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(8)(a), (9)(b), (9)(c), and (10) amended and (9)(d) and (9)(e) added, p. 1830, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2009:

(9)(e) amended and (9)(f) added, (SB 09-262), ch. 202, p. 912, § 1, effective May 1; (2)(a)(I) and (8)(a) amended and (8)(c) added, (HB 09-1164), ch. 215, p. 973, § 4, effective May 2.

L. 2013:

(8)(a)(I) and (8)(c)(II) amended, (8)(b) repealed, and (8)(b.5) added, (SB 13-276), ch. 256, p. 1352, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(2)(a)(I)(B), (8)(a)(I), and (10) amended, (8)(c) repealed, and (9)(g) added, (HB 14-1045), ch. 137, p. 468, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(7) amended, (SB 15-189), ch. 104, p. 304, § 5, effective April 16.

L. 2018:

(2)(a)(IV) and (8)(b.5) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1714, § 64, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(9)(g) and (10) amended, (HB 19-1302), ch. 193, p. 2115, § 1, effective May 16.

25.5-5-309. Pregnant women - needs assessment - referral to treatment program - definition.

The health-care practitioner for each pregnant woman who is enrolled or eligible for services pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(c) or 25.5-5-201 (1)(m.5) is encouraged to identify as soon as possible after the woman is determined to be pregnant whether the woman is at risk of a poor birth outcome due to substance use during the prenatal period and in need of special assistance in order to reduce the risk. If the health-care practitioner makes such determination regarding any pregnant woman, the health-care practitioner is encouraged to refer the woman to any entity approved and licensed by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services for the performance of a needs assessment. Any county department of human or social services may refer an eligible woman for a needs assessment, or any pregnant woman who is eligible for services pursuant to section 25.5-5-201 (1)(m.5) may refer herself for a needs assessment.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, a "needs assessment" means an assessment that is designed to determine the services that are needed for a pregnant woman to minimize the occurrence of a poor birth outcome due to substance use by the pregnant woman.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1875, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 314, § 6, effective April 15.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 116, § 13, effective February 27.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2568, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1513, § 71, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-508.2 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-310. Treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women - cooperation with private entities - definition.

As used in this section, "parenting woman" means a woman up to one year postpartum who is in need of substance use disorder services.

The state department, the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, the department of human services, and the department of public health and environment shall cooperate with any organizations that desire to assist the departments and the administration in the provision of services connected with the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women. Organizations may provide services that are not provided to persons pursuant to this article 5 or article 4 or 6 of this title 25.5 or article 2 of title 26, which services may include but are not limited to needs assessment services, preventive services, rehabilitative services, care coordination, nutrition assessment, psychosocial counseling, intensive health education, home visits, transportation, development of provider training, child care, child care navigation, and other necessary components of residential or outpatient treatment or care.

Health-care practitioners and county departments of human or social services are encouraged to identify any pregnant or parenting woman. If a practitioner or county department of human or social services makes such determination regarding any pregnant or parenting woman up to one year postpartum, the practitioner or county department of human or social services is encouraged to refer the woman to any entity approved and licensed by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services for a needs assessment in order to improve outcomes for the pregnant or parenting woman and child and reduce the likelihood of out-of-home placement. Any pregnant or parenting woman up to one year postpartum may also refer herself for a needs assessment.

The behavioral health administration in the department of human services is authorized to use state money to provide services to women, including women enrolled in the medical assistance program established pursuant to this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5, who enroll, up to one year postpartum, in residential substance use disorder treatment and recovery services, until such time as those services are covered by the medical assistance program. The behavioral health administration in the department of human services may continue to use state money to enroll parenting women in residential services who qualify as indigent but who are not eligible for services under the medical assistance program.

Facilities approved and licensed by the behavioral health administration in the department of human services to provide substance use disorder services to high-risk pregnant and parenting women and that offer child care services must allow a woman to begin treatment without first presenting up-to-date health records for her child, including those referenced in section 25-4-902. The parenting woman in treatment must present up-to-date health records for her child, including those referenced in section 25-4-902, within thirty days after commencing treatment.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1875, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2568, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1511, § 5, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1514, § 72, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-508.4 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-311. Treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women - data collection.

The state department, in cooperation with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, shall create a data collection mechanism regarding persons receiving services pursuant to the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women that includes the collection of any data that the state department and behavioral health administration in the department of human services deem appropriate.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1875, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2569, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1514, § 73, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-508.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-312. Treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women - extended coverage - federal approval.

The state department shall seek federal approval to continue providing substance use disorder treatment and recovery services for twelve months following a pregnancy to women who are eligible to receive services under the medical assistance program, who are receiving services pursuant to the treatment program for high-risk pregnant and parenting women, and who continue to participate in the treatment program. The state department shall implement the continued services to the extent allowed by the federal government.

The state department is authorized to request any federal changes necessary to permit high-risk pregnant and parenting women to further access treatment for pregnant and parenting women with substance use disorders. Any changes to federal waiver programs for this population must preserve the family-oriented specialty services needed by pregnant and parenting women and their dependent children, including those services described in section 25.5-5-310 (1).

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1876, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1193), ch. 272, p. 2570, § 5, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1511, § 6, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-508.6 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1193, see section 1 of chapter 272, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.